Hawaii statutes.
§612-54 Grand jury counsel; call to duty.
Grand jury counsel shall be subject to call by the appointing authority during
the counsel's term of office. Such a call for service shall include an
estimate of the number of hours or days, or other reasonable approximation of
the time that the grand jury shall desire counsel's services. No later than
twenty-four hours after a call to service, the grand jury counsel shall notify
the appointing authority whether or not the call for service is accepted. [L 1980,
c 209, §5]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next